South Dakota, session 2026, HB1269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-5:
Terms used in this Act mean:
(1) "Agricultural equipment," or "equipment," any product originating from the
manufacturer when sold or leased for use in farming or other forms of agriculture,
that depends for its functioning, in whole or in part, on digital electronics embedded
in or attached to it, including any tractor, combine, harvesting equipment, tillage,
planting, irrigation, or cultivating implement, baler, or any off-road vehicle, as
defined in § 32-20-1, which is designed primarily for use in an agricultural
operation. The definition does not include:
(a) A motor vehicle, as defined in chapter 32-5; or
(b) Industrial, construction, mining, or road-building equipment;
(2) "Authorized repair provider," an individual or business that has an arrangement
with the original equipment manufacturer for a definite or indefinite period of time,
under which the manufacturer grants the individual or business a license, or
franchise, to use a trade name, service mark, or related characteristic for the
purpose of offering diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural equipment,
under the name of or on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer;
(3) "Code," subject to the limitations of sections 5 and 6 of this Act, information that
can be read by a human or machine, and which is related to a performance issue
arising from the operation of an owner's agricultural equipment;
(4) "Confidential information," any nonpublic information or nonpublic materials of the
manufacturer, its affiliates, its licensors, or its suppliers, which are related to
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.754.16 2 1269
goods, research and development information, patent rights, or intellectual
property rights;
(5) "Documentation," subject to the limitations of sections 5 and 6 of this Act, any
manual, diagram, reporting output, service code description, schematic drawing,
or other guidance or information, used in diagnosing, maintaining, repairing, or
upgrading agricultural equipment;
(6) "Embedded software," any programmable instructions provided on firmware
delivered with or loaded onto the agricultural equipment, including assembly code,
basic internal operating system, internal operating system, machine code,
microcode, root code, and all relevant patches, fixes, and updates from the
manufacturer;
(7) "Fair and reasonable terms," at fair and commercially reasonable terms that do not
impose unreasonable burdens on an independent repair provider or owner;
(8) "Firmware," a software program or set of instructions programmed on agricultural
equipment, or on a part of the agricultural equipment, to allow the agricultural
equipment or part to communicate within itself or with other computer hardware;
(9) "Goods," code, confidential information, documentation, embedded software,
agricultural equipment, parts, software, specialty tools, tools, updates, and any
other product or service distributed, manufactured, or made available by or
through a manufacturer;
(10) "Independent repair provider," an individual or business that is not affiliated with
an authorized repair provider or manufacturer, with respect to agricultural
equipment, but is engaged in diagnosing, maintaining, or repairing agricultural
equipment generally and is willing and capable of repairing agricultural equipment;
(11) "Manufacturer," any individual or business engaged in the business of making new
and complete agricultural equipment;
(12) "Obsolete," no longer produced, sold, exchanged, or maintained by a
manufacturer;
(13) "Owner," an individual or business that owns or leases agricultural equipment
purchased or used in this state;
(14) "Part," any replacement part made available or used by a manufacturer or its
authorized repair provider for maintenance or repair of agricultural equipment
manufactured by or on behalf of, sold, or otherwise supplied by the manufacturer;
(15) "Safety," any goods that are intended to prevent injury, harm, danger, or loss to
individuals or property;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.754.16 3 1269
(16) "Software," a publicly available digital platform that provides access to technical
manuals, diagnostic codes, equipment calibrations, and other publicly available
resources, which are necessary for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
agricultural equipment;
(17) "Specialty tool," a mechanical implement originating from the manufacturer, which
is necessary to facilitate mechanical or electrical maintenance, repair, or upgrade
of a manufacturer's agricultural equipment, and which is not generally available
other than from the manufacturer's authorized repair facilities;
(18) "Tool," any software, hardware implement, or other apparatus originating from the
manufacturer, which is used for data readout, diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
agricultural equipment, including software or other mechanisms that calibrate
functionality or perform any other function required to operate, maintain, upgrade,
activate, or bring the agricultural equipment back to a fully functional condition;
(19) "Trade secret," as defined in § 37-29-1; and
(20) "Updates," recommended corrections or adjustments to documentation, parts,
software, specialty tools, tools, or information that are created and distributed by
the manufacturer and used in offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or
repair of agricultural equipment.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-5:
For agricultural equipment and parts for agricultural equipment that are sold or
used in this state, a manufacturer shall make available on fair and reasonable terms to
any independent repair provider and any owner of agricultural equipment manufactured
by, on behalf of, or sold by the manufacturer, any code, documentation, parts, software,
specialty tools, tools, and updates, inclusive of any updates to information on embedded
software, required for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the agricultural equipment.
The code, documentation, parts, software, specialty tools, tools, and updates, must be
made available either directly by the manufacturer or through an authorized repair
provider or distributor.
For agricultural equipment that contains an electronic lock, immobilizer, or other
security-related function, pursuant to this chapter and subject to the limitations of sections
5 and 6 of this Act, the manufacturer shall make available to an independent repair
provider or owner, on fair and reasonable terms, any documentation and tools needed to
disable the lock, immobilizer, or function, and to reset it when disabled in the ordinary
course of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the agricultural equipment.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.754.16 4 1269
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-5:
A manufacturer's failure to provide code, documentation, parts, software, specialty
tools, or tools, as described in section 2 of this Act, constitutes a deceptive act or practice
pursuant to § 37-24-6.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-5:
Nothing in this Act may be construed to require a manufacturer to:
(1) Divulge any trade secret or any proprietary or confidential information;
(2) Alter the terms of any arrangement between an authorized repair provider and a
manufacturer, including the authorized repair provider's performance or provision
of warranty or recall repair work on behalf of a manufacturer and pursuant to such
an arrangement, except that any provision that purports to waive, avoid, restrict,
or limit the manufacturer’s obligations to comply with this Act is void and
unenforceable;
(3) Make available goods that would disable or override safety features or emission
controls to adjust agricultural equipment power levels;
(4) Develop new goods or update any obsolete goods in order to comply with this
section;
(5) Violate any federal, state, or local laws or regulations;
(6) Provide an owner or independent repair provider access to any goods that are not
required for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural equipment, or any
goods that would enable reverse engineering of a manufacturer's goods;
(7) Provide goods directly to an independent repair provider or owner provided the
goods are made available through an authorized repair provider; or
(8) Violate any confidentiality obligations or provide any information, mechanism,
device, or other means, to allow an encrypted file to be unencrypted.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-5:
An independent repair provider or owner may not:
(1) Modify agricultural equipment to deactivate an anti-theft, safety, or security
notification system, except as necessary to provide diagnosis, maintenance, or
repair services, and if deactivation is necessary, the independent repair provider
or owner must immediately reactivate any anti-theft, safety, or security notification
system upon the completion of the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.754.16 5 1269
(2) Override safety features, emission controls, adjust agricultural equipment power
levels, or make any other modification to equipment , which brings the equipment
out of compliance with any applicable federal, state, or local law or regulation;
(3) Access any function of a tool that allows the settings for a piece of agricultural
equipment to be changed in a manner that brings the equipment out of compliance
with any applicable federal, state, or local law or regulation; or
(4) Obtain or use code, documentation, parts, software, specialty tools, tools, or
updates, to evade or violate emissions, copyright, trademark, safety, or patent
laws, or to engage in any other illegal activity.
An independent repair provider or owner who violates any provision of this section
is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-5:
Neither a manufacturer nor an authorized repair provider is liable for any violation
of law, damage, or injury to any agricultural equipment, individual, or person, which
occurs during the course of, or as a result of, the repair, diagnosis, or maintenance of
agricultural equipment by an independent repair provider or owner, provided the violation,
damage, or injury occurred as a result of a manufacturer or authorized repair provider
complying with this Act. This provision is not intended to release a manufacturer from any
liability attributable to design or manufacturing defects as per chapter 20-9.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-5:
This Act applies to equipment first manufactured and sold on or after January 1,
2014.
Section 8. This Act is effective beginning October 1, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.